Utah statutes.
48-3a-1208.   Dissolution of a series.

(1)  Except to the extent otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a series may be dissolved and its affairs wound up without causing the dissolution of the limited liability company.

(2)  The dissolution of a series does not affect the limitation on liabilities of the series under Section 48-3a-1201.

(3)  A series is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the dissolution of the limited liability company under Section 48-3a-701 or upon the occurrence of any of the events described in Section 48-3a-701, as applied to the series.

(4)  Notwithstanding Section 48-3a-703, unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, any of the following persons may wind up the affairs of a dissolved series:

(a)  a manager associated with a series who has not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series;

(b)  if there is no manager that satisfies the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the members associated with the series who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series or a person approved by the members associated with the series who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series; or

(c)  if there is more than one class or group of members associated with the series, then by each class or group of members associated with the series, in either case, by members who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series, and either:

(i)  own more than 50% of the transferable interests of the series owned by members associated with the series who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series; or

(ii)  own more than 50% of the transferable interests of each class or group associated with the series owned by members associated with the series who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution of the series.

(5)  The persons winding up the affairs of a series, in the name of the series and for and on behalf of the series, may take all actions with respect to the series as are permitted under Section 48-3a-703 for a limited liability company.  The persons winding up the affairs of a series shall provide for the claims and obligations of the series as provided in Section 48-3a-711 for a limited liability company and distribute the assets of the series as provided in Section 48-3a-711 for a limited liability company.  An action taken pursuant to this Subsection (5) may not affect the liability of a member and may not impose liability on a liquidating trustee.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

